Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1539
Sale of lands and tenements; deed by sheriff's successor.

If the term of service of the sheriff, or other officer, who has made or shall hereafter make sale of any lands and tenements, shall expire, or if the sheriff or officer shall be absent, or be rendered unable, by death or otherwise, to make a deed of conveyance of the same, any succeeding sheriff or other officer, on receiving a certificate from the court from which the execution issued for the sale of said lands and tenements, signed by the clerk, by order of said court, setting forth that sufficient proof has been made to the court that such sale was fairly and legally made, and on tender of the purchase money, or if the same or any part thereof be paid, then, on proof of such payment and tender of the balance, if any, may execute to the said purchaser or purchasers, or his or their legal representative, a deed of conveyance of said lands and tenements so sold. Such deed shall be as good and valid in law and have the same effect as if the sheriff or other officer who made the sale had executed the same.

R.S.1867, Code § 506, p. 480;

R.S.1913, § 8085;

C.S.1922, § 9021;

C.S.1929, § 20-1539;

R.S.1943, § 25-1539.